en: guajillo chili
es: chile guajillo
hr: guajillo čili
it: guajillo
ja: ワヒーヨ
ko: 미라솔고추
sv: guajillo chili
vi: ớt guajillo

en: spicy red pepper
de: scharfer roter Pfeffer
es: ñora, ñoras
hr: ljuta crvena paprika
it: peperoncino rosso piccante

en: friggitello, friggitelli, Golden Greek pepper, Sweet Italian pepper, Tuscan pepper, pepperoncini
sv: feferoni, peperoni

en: hot friggitello
sv: stark feferoni

en: peri-peri, peri peri, piri-piri, pili-pili, pili pili
de: Piri Piri, Piri-Piri
fr: pili-pili, pili pili
hr: peri-peri
nl: pili pili
pl: papryka piri piri

en: Korean chili pepper
it: peperoncino coreano

en: Korean chili powder, gochugaru
xx: gochugaru
de: Koreanisches Chilipulver, Gochugaru
es: Pimentón coreano en polvo, gochugaru
fr: Poudre de piment coréen, gochugaru
pl: papryka gochugaru

en: Japanese pepper
xx: Zanthoxylum piperitum
ja: 山椒
ko: 초피
la: Zanthoxylum piperitum

en: Sichuan pepper
ar: فلفل سشوان
da: sichuanpeber
hr: sečuanski papar
it: pepe di Sichuan
nb: sichuanpepper
nl: cichuan peper
pl: pieprz syczuański
sv: sichuanpeppar
zh: 花椒

en: paprika
ar: بابريكا
az: paprika
br: paprika
bs: paprika
ca: pebre vermell, piment vermell, pebre vermell picant
cy: Paprica
da: paprika
el: πάπρικα
eo: papriko
es: pimentón, paprika
eu: piperrauts
fa: پاپریکا
fr: paprika
ga: pemento
he: פפריקה
hr: začinska paprika
hu: fűszerpaprika-őrlemény
io: papriko
it: paprica, paprika
ja: パプリカ
ko: 파프리카
lt: paprika
mk: црвен пипер
ms: paprika
pt: paprica
ro: boia
ru: паприка
sr: паприка
tg: паприка
tl: Paprika
uk: паприка
zh: 辣椒粉

en: paprika powder
bg: червен пипер на прах
de: Paprikagewürz
es: paprika en polvo, pimentón en polvo, polvo de paprika, polvo de pimentón
et: paprikapulber
fr: Paprika en poudre
hr: paprika u prahu
it: paprika in polvere
nl: paprikapoeder
pl: papryka w proszku, papryka suszona, papryka suszona czerwona, papryka czerwona suszona, papryka mielona
ro: boia de ardei

en: smoked paprika
it: paprika affumicata
nl: gerookte paprika

en: paprika paste
de: Paprikapaste
fi: paprikatahna
fr: Pâte de paprika
hr: pasta od paprike
it: pasta di paprika
pl: pasta paprykowa

bg: сладък червен пипер
ca: pebre vermell dolç, pebre vermella dolça
de: Paprika edelsüß
es: pimienta roja dulce, pimentón dulce
fr: Paprika doux
hr: slatka paprika
it: paprika dolce
pl: papryka w proszku słodka, słodka papryka w proszku, papryka słodka suszona, papryka słodka mielona

en: hot paprika
it: paprika piccante
pl: ostra papryka, ostra papryka w proszku, papryka ostra, papryka ostra mielona

en: fruit vegetable
it: frutta verdura
lv: Augļu dārzeņi
nl: fruitgroente, groentevrucht

en: tomato, tomatoes
ab: Атомат
am: ቲማቲም
bg: домат, домати
bo: ལྡུམ་སྒོང་།
ca: tomàquet
cs: rajče, rajčata
da: tomat, tomater
de: Tomate, Tomaten
dv: ވިލާތު ބަށި
eo: tomato
es: tomate, tomates
et: tomat, tomatid
eu: Tomate
fi: tomaatti, tomaatit
fr: tomate, tomates
gl: tomate
gu: tomate
he: עגבנייה
hr: rajčica, rajčice, od rajčice, paradajz
ht: Tomat
hu: paradicsom
ia: Tomato
it: pomodoro, pomodori
iu: ᒥᓗᑦᓱᑳᒐᖅ
ja: トマト
ln: tomáti
lv: tomāts
mg: Voatabia
ml: തക്കാളി
nb: tomat, tomater
nl: tomaat, tomaten
nn: tomat, tomater
oc: Tomata
pl: Pomidor, pomidory, pomidorów, pomidora, pomidorowy, pomidorowe, pomidorowa
pt: tomate, tomates
rn: Tomati
ro: roșie, roșii, tomată, tomate
ru: томат, помидор, помидоры, томаты
rw: Inyanya
sa: वार्तकी
sc: Tamata
sk: paradajky
sn: Madomasi
so: Yaanyo
sr: paradajz
sv: tomat, tomater
th: มะเขือเทศ
tr: domates
ug: پەمىدۇر
za: makyungz
zh: 番茄
zu: Utamatisi

en: organic tomato
bg: био домати
de: Biologische Tomaten
es: tomate orgánico
fi: luomutomaatti, luomu tomaatti
fr: tomates biologiques, tomates issues de l'agriculture durable
hr: organska rajčica
it: pomodoro biologico
nl: biologische tomaat, biologische tomaten

en: fresh tomatoes
bg: пресни домати
de: frische Tomaten
es: Tomates frescos
fi: tuore tomaatti, tuoreet tomaatit
fr: tomates fraîches
hr: svježe rajčice
it: pomodori freschi
nl: verse tomaten
ru: томаты свежие

en: grilled tomato
de: gegrillte Tomaten
es: tomate asado
fi: grillattu tomaatti
fr: tomate grillée
hr: rajčica na žaru
it: pomodoro grigliato
nl: gegrilde tomaat